Utah statutes.
38-1-19.   Payment by owner to contractor -- Subcontractor's lien not
affected.
When any subcontractor shall have actually begun to furnish labor or materials
for which he is entitled to a lien no payment to the original contractor shall
impair or defeat such lien; and no alteration of any contract shall affect any
lien acquired under the provisions of this chapter.
